Washington statutes.
RCW 43.88.200

Public records.

All agency records reflecting financial transactions, such records being defined for purposes of this chapter to mean books of account, financial statements, and supporting records including expense vouchers and other evidences of obligation, shall be deemed to be public records and shall be available for public inspection in the agency concerned during official working hours.

[ 1965 c 8 s 43.88.200. Prior: 1959 c 328 s 20.]